Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 13. Uniform Partnership Act (1997)

A former Chapter 13, entitled “Limited Partnerships,” was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105, effective from and after January 1, 1988 (codified as § 79-14-1105). Former Chapter 13 contained the following undesignated headings:

“Mississippi Uniform Limited Partnership Law” [Codes, 1942, §§ 5553-01 through 5553-29; Laws, 1964, ch. 271, §§ 1 through 29], comprising former §§ 79-13-1 through 79-13-57;

“Limited Partnerships Under Prior Laws” [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 40, art 1; 1857, ch. 38, art. 1 et seq; 1871, §§ 1857-1877; 1880, §§ 1005-1024; 1892, §§ 2764-2781; 1906, §§ 3129-3146; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5467-5484; 1930, §§ 5394-5411; 1942, §§ 5553-5570; Laws, 1942, ch. 320; Laws, 1944, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 510, §§ 1 through 3], comprising former §§ 79-13-101 through 79-13-137; and

“Foreign Limited Partnerships” [Laws, 1979, ch. 420, §§ 2 through 10], comprising former §§ 79-13-201 through 79-13-217.

For present similar provisions relating to limited partnerships, see §§ 79-14-101 et seq.